District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.04

General building interior.

(a)

An ALR shall ensure that the interior of its facility including walls, ceilings, doors, windows, equipment, and fixtures are maintained structurally sound, sanitary, and in good repair.

(b)

An ALR shall ensure that floors and stairways provide a clean, slip-resistant, and safe surface, free of tripping hazards.

(c)

An ALR shall install and maintain assist handrails or grab bars, whenever practicable, on each side of interior stairways and on one side of corridors and in bathrooms.

(d)

An ALR shall provide common areas for social and recreational use totaling at least 35 square feet per resident for living, dining, therapy, and recreational activities.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1004, 47 DCR 2647

History